North Carolina, session 2025, HB44.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 6-21.6 reads as rewritten:
"§ 6-21.6. Reciprocal attorneys' fees provisions in business contracts.
(a) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:
(1) Business contract. – A contract entered into primarily for business or
commercial purposes. The term does not include a consumer contract, an
employment contract, or a contract to which a government or a governmental
agency of this State is a party.
(2) Consumer contract. – A contract entered into by one or more individuals
primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.
(3) Employment contract. – A contract between an individual and another party
to provide personal services by that individual to the other party, whether the
relationship is in the nature of employee-employer or principal-independent
contractor.
(4) Reciprocal attorneys' fees provisions. – Provisions in any written business
contract by which each party to the contract agrees, in the manner set out in
subsection (b) of this section, upon the terms and subject to the conditions set
forth in the contract that are made applicable to all parties, to pay or reimburse
the other parties for attorneys' fees and expenses incurred by reason of any
suit, action, proceeding, or arbitration involving the business contract.
(b) Reciprocal attorneys' fees provisions in business contracts are valid and enforceable
for the recovery of reasonable attorneys' fees and expenses only if all of the parties to the business
contract sign by hand the business contract. Signature "by hand" is not intended to prevent the
application of this section to a business contract executed by either the contract by hand or with
one of the following:
(1) A party's An electronic signature, as defined in G.S. 66-312, if the party's
electronic signature originates from an affirmative action on the part of the
party to evidence acceptance and execution such as typing the party's signature
or writing the party's signature with a finger or stylus on a touchscreen to
indicate acceptance and execution.
*H44-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) A party's manual signature that is delivered by an electronic reproductive
image thereof.
(c) If a business contract governed by the laws of this State contains a reciprocal
attorneys' fees provision, the court or arbitrator in any suit, action, proceeding, or arbitration
involving the business contract may award reasonable attorneys' fees in accordance with the
terms of the business contract. In determining reasonable attorneys' fees and expenses under this
section, the court or arbitrator may consider all relevant facts and circumstances, including, but
not limited to, the following:
…
(7) Offers of judgment pursuant to Rule 68 of the North Carolina Rules of Civil
Procedure G.S. 1A-1, Rule 68, and whether judgment finally obtained was
more favorable than such these offers.
…
(d) Reasonable attorneys' fees and expenses shall not be are not governed by (i) any
statutory presumption or provision in the business contract providing for a stated percentage of
the amount of such the attorneys' fees or (ii) the amount recovered in other cases in which the
business contract contains reciprocal attorneys' fees provisions.
(e) Nothing in this section shall in any way make valid or invalid makes valid or invalid
attorneys' fees provisions in consumer contracts or in any note, conditional sale contract, or other
evidence of indebtedness that is otherwise governed by G.S. 6-21.2. If the business contract is
also a note, conditional sale contract, or other evidence of indebtedness that is otherwise governed
by G.S. 6-21.2, then the parties that are entitled to recover attorneys' fees and expenses may elect
to recover attorneys' fees and expenses either under this section or G.S. 6-21.2 but may recover
only once for the same attorneys' fees and expenses.
(f) In any suit, action, proceeding, or arbitration primarily for the recovery of monetary
damages, the award of reasonable attorneys' fees may shall not exceed the amount in controversy.
(g) Nothing in this section shall in any way make valid or invalid makes valid or invalid
attorneys' fees provisions in a contract of insurance governed by Chapter 58 of the General
Statutes."
SECTION 2.(a) Subsection (e) of G.S. 10B-5 is recodified as the fourth and fifth
sentences of subdivision (b)(8) of that section.
SECTION 2.(b) G.S. 10B-5, as amended by subsection (a) of this section, reads as
rewritten:
"§ 10B-5. Qualifications.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, the Secretary shall commission
as a notary any qualified person who submits an application in accordance with this Chapter.
(b) A person qualified for a notarial commission shall meet all of the following
requirements:
…
(8) Submit an application containing no significant misstatement or omission of
fact. The application form shall be provided by the Secretary and be available
at the register of deeds office in each county. Every application shall include
the signature of the applicant written with pen and ink, applicant, and the
signature shall be acknowledged by the applicant before a person authorized
to administer oaths. Notwithstanding subdivision (8) of subsection (b) of this
section, the An applicant's signature on an initial application shall be written
with pen and ink. The Secretary may allow applications for commissions to
be submitted electronically, in the format prescribed by the Secretary. The
Secretary shall establish a process for submission of the signature of the
applicant prior to commissioning, which applicant's signature that may
include electronic submission.
Page 2 House Bill 44-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(9) Repealed by Session Laws 2013-204, s. 1, effective July 1, 2013.
(c) The notary shall be commissioned in his or her county of residence, unless the notary
is not a North Carolina resident, in which case he or she shall be commissioned in the county of
his or her employment or business.
(d) The Secretary may deny an application for commission or recommission if any of the
following apply applies to an applicant:
(1) Submission of an incomplete application or an application containing a
material misstatement or omission of fact.
(2) The applicant's conviction or plea of admission or nolo contendere to a felony
or any crime involving dishonesty or moral turpitude. In no case may shall a
commission be issued to an applicant within 10 years after release from prison,
probation, or parole, whichever is later.
(3) A finding or admission of liability against the applicant in a civil lawsuit based
on the applicant's deceit.
(4) The revocation, suspension, restriction, or denial of a notarial commission or
professional license by this or any other state or nation. In no case may shall
a commission be issued to an applicant within five years after the completion
of all conditions of any disciplinary order.
…
(e) Recodified."
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
House Bill 44-First Edition Page 3